Massachusetts, session 194th, H3881.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 161A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following paragraph:— (s) The authority and any regional or local transportation authority in the
Commonwealth shall permit any veteran, as certified by the United States Department of
Defense, to use commuter rail, subway, bus, shuttle and boat services at no cost to said veteran;
provided that said veteran is utilizing transportation to travel to or from a Veterans
Administration hospital for medical care; and provided further, that said veteran presents proof
of a medical appointment on the date of travel in the form of a notice from the Veterans
Administration indicating the veteran’s name and the date and location of said appointment.
of 1